Montana, session 2025, HB476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Grant program for installation and maintenance of newborn safety devices --
rulemaking authority. (1) The department of public health and human services shall award competitive grants
to eligible fire departments, hospitals, and law enforcement agencies for the installation and maintenance of
newborn safety devices.
(2) The department may not award more than $20,000 to an applicant.
(3) An applicant or recipient shall comply with the provisions of 40-6-401 through [section 1] and
rules established by the department for the administration of the program.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section, including provisions for an
application process, evaluation criteria, and information reporting by grant recipients.
(5) The department shall report to the children, families, health, and human services interim
committee on the status and results of the program by September 30, 2027.
Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $160,000 from the general fund to the department
of public health and human services for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes of [section 1].
Funds that are unencumbered by June 30, 2027, must revert to the general fund.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
40, chapter 6, part 4, and the provisions of Title 40, chapter 6, part 4, apply to [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 476
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 476
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 5. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 476
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 476, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 476
INTRODUCED BY R. GREGG, S. KLAKKEN, E. ALBUS, K. LOVE, G. OVERSTREET, E. BYRNE, C.
SCHOMER, M. THIEL, M. BERTOGLIO, C. HINKLE, A. REGIER, C. SPRUNGER, J. KASSMIER, G.
LAMMERS, S. FITZPATRICK, B. LER, R. MINER, G. OBLANDER, J. ETCHART, G. KMETZ, B. MITCHELL, K.
SEEKINS-CROWE, Z. WIRTH, S. ESSMANN, V. MOORE, L. DEMING
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A GRANT PROGRAM FOR THE INSTALLATION AND MAINTENANCE OF
NEWBORN SAFETY DEVICES; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY;
AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”